Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. Offenses Related to Riot, Disorderly Conduct, Pornography, Indecency, Gangs, Corpses, or Animals.

Sec. 11.61.100.
Riot.

A person commits the crime of riot if, while participating with five or more others, the person engages in tumultuous and violent conduct in a public place and thereby causes, or creates a substantial risk of causing, damage to property or physical injury to a person.

Riot is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public place,” “property,” “physical injury” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Disorderly conduct — AS

11.61.110

Reckless endangerment — AS

11.41.250

Legal accountability based upon the conduct of another: complicity — AS

11.16.110

Original Code Provision — AS 11.45.010; AS 11.45.020.

TD: V, 82-84.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.61.110.
Disorderly conduct.

A person commits the crime of disorderly conduct if,

with intent to disturb the peace and privacy of another not physically on the same premises or with reckless disregard that the conduct is having that effect after being informed that it is having that effect, the person makes unreasonably loud noise;

in a public place or in a private place of another without consent, and with intent to disturb the peace and privacy of another or with reckless disregard that the conduct is having that effect after being informed that it is having that effect, the person makes unreasonably loud noise;

in a public place, when a crime has occurred, the person refuses to comply with a lawful order of a peace officer to disperse;

in a private place, the person refuses to comply with an order of a peace officer to leave premises in which the person has neither a right of possession nor the express invitation to remain of a person having a right of possession;

in a public or private place, the person challenges another to fight or engages in fighting other than in self-defense;

the person recklessly creates a hazardous condition for others by an act which has no legal justification or excuse; or

the offender intentionally exposes the offender’s buttock or anus to another with reckless disregard for the offensive or insulting effect the act may have on that person.

As used in this section, “noise” is “unreasonably loud” if, considering the nature and purpose of the defendant’s conduct and the circumstances known to the defendant, including the nature of the location and the time of day or night, the conduct involves a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person would follow in the same situation. “Noise” does not include speech that is constitutionally protected.

Disorderly conduct is a class B misdemeanor and is punishable as authorized in AS 12.55 except that a sentence of imprisonment, if imposed, shall be for a definite term of not more than

72 hours if the offense is a first conviction;

10 days if the offense is a second or subsequent conviction.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 32 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 40 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “premises,” “public place,” “peace officer” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Indecent exposure — AS

11.41.460

Harassment — AS

11.61.120

Trespass in the first and second degree — AS

11.46.320

—

11.46.330

Assault in the fourth degree — AS

11.41.230

Original Code Provision — AS 11.45.030.

TD: V, 84-87.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (c), see sec. 185(a)(23), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (c), deleted “and is punishable as authorized in AS 12.55 except that a sentence of imprisonment, if imposed, shall be for a definite term of not more than 10 days” following “class B misdemeanor”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (c), which read, “Disorderly conduct is a class B misdemeanor.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (c) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.61.116.
Sending an explicit image of a minor.

A person commits the offense of sending an explicit image of a minor if the person, with intent to annoy or humiliate another person, distributes an electronic photograph or video that depicts the genitals, anus, or female breast of that other person taken when that person was a minor under 16 years of age.

In this section,

“computer” has the meaning given in AS

11.46.990

;

“distributes” means to deliver the image to another person by sending the image to the other person’s computer or telephone;

“Internet” has the meaning given in AS

11.46.710(d)

.

Sending an explicit image of a minor is

a class B misdemeanor if the person distributes the image to another person;

a class A misdemeanor if the person distributes the image to an Internet website that is accessible to the public.

History.

(§ 11 ch 20 SLA 2011)

Cross references. —

For jurisdiction over crimes under this section, see
AS

12.05.030

.

For punishment, see
AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors,
AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.61.118.
Harassment in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of harassment in the first degree if, under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

, the person violates AS

11.61.120(a)(5)

and the offensive physical contact is contact

with human or animal blood, mucus, saliva, semen, urine, vomitus, or feces; or

by the person touching through clothing another person’s genitals, buttocks, or female breast.

Harassment in the first degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 87 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 18 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 11 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, rewrote (a).

Editor's notes. —

Section 21(a), ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 enactment of (a)(2) of this section applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.

Section 11,
ch. 11, SLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after October 17, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 18, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 222), relating to the amendment of (a) of this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1237 — 1239.

Sec. 11.61.120.
Harassment in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of harassment in the second degree if, with intent to harass or annoy another person, that person

insults, taunts, or challenges another person in a manner likely to provoke an immediate violent response;

telephones another and fails to terminate the connection with intent to impair the ability of that person to place or receive telephone calls;

makes repeated telephone calls at extremely inconvenient hours;

makes an anonymous or obscene telephone call, an obscene electronic communication, or a telephone call or electronic communication that threatens physical injury or sexual contact;

subjects another person to offensive physical contact;

except as provided in AS

11.61.116

, publishes or distributes electronic or printed photographs, pictures, or films that show the genitals, anus, or female breast of the other person or show that person engaged in a sexual act;

repeatedly sends or publishes an electronic communication that insults, taunts, challenges, or intimidates a person under 18 years of age in a manner that places the person in reasonable fear of physical injury; or

under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.41.455

, AS

11.61.125

, or

11.61.128

, repeatedly sends to another person, publishes, or distributes electronic or printed photographs, pictures, or films that show the genitals of any person.

Harassment in the second degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 61 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 64 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 2006; am § 12 ch 20 SLA 2011; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 2014; am § 41 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “physical injury” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Disorderly conduct — AS

11.61.110(a)(5)

Domestic violence injunctions — AS

25.35.010

, 25.35.020

Violating a Domestic Violence Restraining Order — AS

11.56.740

Original Code Provision — AS 11.45.035

TD: V, 87-89.

For provisions authorizing arrest without warrant in certain cases where the police officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person has committed a crime under this section, see
AS

12.25.030(b)

.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, added (a)(8), and made related stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent relating to the amendment of (a) of this section by sec. 1, ch. 13, SLA 2003 (CSHB 12 (Jud) am), see 2003 House Journal 181, 255 and 2003 Senate Journal 490, 769.

Sec. 11.61.123.
Indecent viewing or production of a picture.

A person commits the crime of indecent viewing or production of a picture if the person knowingly

views, or views a picture of, the private exposure of the genitals, anus, or female breast of another person; or

produces a picture of the private exposure of the genitals, anus, or female breast of another person.

Each viewing of a person, and each production of a picture of a person, whose genitals, anus, or female breast are viewed or are shown in a picture constitutes a separate violation of this section.

This section does not apply to the viewing or production of a picture conducted by a law enforcement agency for a law enforcement purpose.

In a prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense that the viewing or production of a picture was conducted as a security surveillance system, notice of the viewing or production was posted, and any viewing or use of pictures produced is done only in the interest of crime prevention or prosecution.

In this section,

“picture” means a film, photograph, negative, slide, book, newspaper, or magazine, whether in print, electronic, magnetic, or digital format; and

“private exposure” means that a person has exposed the person’s body or part of the body in a place, and under circumstances, that the person reasonably believed would not result in the person’s body or body parts being viewed by the defendant or produced in a picture; “private exposure” does not include the exposure of a person’s body or body parts in a law enforcement facility, correctional facility, treatment institution, designated treatment facility, juvenile treatment facility, or juvenile detention facility; in this paragraph,

“correctional facility” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

;

“designated treatment facility” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

;

“juvenile detention facility” and “juvenile treatment facility” have the meanings given in AS

47.12.990

;

“treatment institution” has the meaning given in AS

47.14.990

.

The provisions of this section do not apply to acts

that may reasonably be construed to be normal caretaker responsibilities for a child, interactions with a child, or affection for a child; or

performed for the purpose of administering a recognized and lawful form of treatment that is reasonably adapted to promoting the physical or mental health of the person being treated.

Indecent viewing or production of a picture is a

class B felony if the person violates (a)(2) of this section and the person shown in the picture was, at the time of the production of the picture, a minor;

class C felony if the person

violates (a)(1) of this section and the person viewed

was, at the time of the viewing, a minor; or

in the picture was, at the time of the production of the picture, a minor; or

violates (a)(2) of this section and the person shown in the picture was, at the time of the production of the picture, an adult;

class A misdemeanor if the person violates (a)(1) of this section and the person viewed

was, at the time of the viewing, an adult; or

in the picture was, at the time of the production of the picture, an adult.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 33 SLA 1999; am §§ 42 — 46 ch 4 FSSLA 2019; am § 8 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (f) [now (g)] was enacted as (c) and subsections (c)-(e) were enacted as (d)-(f), respectively. Relettered in 1995. Subsection (f) was enacted as (g). Relettered in 2019, at which time former (f) was relettered as (g).

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For imprisonment for class B and C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

and (i).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (a), which read, “A person commits the crime of indecent viewing or photography if, in the state, the person knowingly views, or produces a picture of, the private exposure of the genitals, anus, or female breast of another person and the view or production is without the knowledge or consent of

“(1) the parent or guardian of the person viewed, or who is shown in the picture, if the person who is viewed or shown is under 16 years of age; and

“(2) the person viewed or shown in the picture, if the person viewed or shown is at least 13 years of age.”; in (c), substituted “apply to the viewing or production of a picture” for “apply to viewing or photography”; in (d), substituted “production of a picture” and “production” for “photography”; rewrote (f) [now (g)], which read, “Indecent viewing or photography is a

“(1) class C felony if the person viewed or shown in a picture was, at the time of the viewing or production of the picture, a minor;

“(2) class A misdemeanor if the person viewed or shown in a picture was, at the time of the viewing or production of the picture, an adult.”; and added (g) [now (f)].

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (e)(2), in the introductory language, inserted “treatment institution,” following “correctional facility,” and “juvenile treatment facility,” following “designated treatment facility,”, added the (A) – (C) designations, in (e)(2)(C), substituted “and “juvenile treatment facility have the meanings” for “has the meaning”, added (e)(2)(D), and made related and stylistic changes throughout.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 2, ch. 29, SLA 1995, this section “applies to all offenses committed on or after August 13, 1995.”

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Section 57(a), ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendment of (e)(2) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2021.” Section 57(b), ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendment of (e)(2) of this section applies to minors subject to AS

47.12.030(a)

, as amended by sec. 22, ch. 16, SLA 2021, and AS

47.12.100

“who are held in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a facility operated by the Department of Health and Social Services on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 16, SLA 2021 (HB 105), which amended (e)(2) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 181 — 182.

Sec. 11.61.124.
Solicitation or production of an indecent picture of a minor.

An offender commits the crime of solicitation or production of an indecent picture of a minor if, under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.41.455

or AS

11.61.123

, the offender being 18 years of age or older

solicits a picture of the genitals, anus, or female breast of another person and the

person solicited is under 16 years of age and at least four years younger than the offender; or

offender believes that the other person is under 16 years of age and at least four years younger than the offender; or

produces a picture of the genitals, anus, or female breast of another person and the

person shown in the picture is under 16 years of age and at least four years younger than the offender; or

offender believes that the other person is under 16 years of age and at least four years younger than the offender.

In a prosecution under (a) of this section, it is not a defense that the person solicited or shown in the picture was not actually a person under 16 years of age and at least four years younger than the offender.

In a prosecution under (a)(1) of this section, it is not necessary for the prosecution to show that a picture was actually produced.

The provisions of this section do not apply to acts

that may reasonably be construed to be normal caretaker responsibilities for a child, interactions with a child, or affection for a child; or

performed for the purpose of administering a recognized and lawful form of treatment that is reasonably adapted to promoting the physical or mental health of the person being treated.

In this section, “picture” has the meaning given in AS

11.61.123(e)

.

Solicitation or production of an indecent picture of a minor is a

class C felony if an offender

violates (a)(1) of this section and the person solicited is under 13 years of age; or

violates (a)(2) of this section;

class A misdemeanor if an offender violates (a)(1) of this section and the person solicited is 13 years of age or older.

History.

(§ 47 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see
AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies,
AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effective dates. —

Section 150,
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019 makes this section effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.61.125.
Distribution of child pornography.

A person commits the crime of distribution of child pornography if the person distributes in this state or advertises, promotes, solicits, or offers to distribute in this state any material that is proscribed under AS

11.61.127

.

This section does not apply to acts that are an integral part of the exhibition or performance of a motion picture if the acts are performed within the scope of employment by a motion picture operator or projectionist employed by the owner or manager of a theater or other place for the showing of motion pictures, unless the motion picture operator or projectionist

has a financial interest in the theater or place in which employed; or

causes the performance or motion picture to be performed or exhibited without the consent of the manager or owner of the theater or other place of showing.

The possession of 100 or more films, audio, video, electronic, or electromagnetic recordings, photographs, negatives, slides, books, newspapers, magazines, or other materials, including a combination of these items totaling 100 or more, is prima facie evidence of distribution and intent to distribute under (a) of this section.

In this section, “distribution” includes the following, whether or not for monetary or other consideration: delivering, selling, renting, leasing, lending, giving, circulating, exhibiting, presenting, providing, exchanging, placing on a computer network or computer system, and providing billing collection, or other ancillary services for or otherwise supporting these activities.

Distribution of child pornography is a

class B felony; or

class A felony if the person has been previously convicted of distribution of child pornography in this jurisdiction or a similar crime in this or another jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 2 ch 57 SLA 1983; am §§ 1, 2 ch 39 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 161 SLA 1990; am §§ 5, 6 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 65 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 41 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 131 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 18 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

Definition of “knowing,” “intent” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “possess” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Unlawful exploitation of a minor — AS

11.41.455

Sexual abuse of a minor in the first, second, third, and fourth degree — AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.440

For crime of unlawful exploitation of a minor, see AS

11.41.455

.

For applicability provisions relating to the 2000 amendment of (d) of this section by sec. 15, ch. 65, SLA 2000, see sec. 18, ch. 65, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

For applicability provision relating to the 2003 amendment of (d) of this section by § 3, ch. 41, SLA 2003, see § 5, ch. 41, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative letter of intent relating to the amendment of (a) of this section by sec. 1, ch. 13, SLA 2003 (CSHB 12 (Jud) am), see 2003 House Journal 181, 255 and 2003 Senate Journal 490, 769. For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(i)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(i)

and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (e). Relettered in 1998, at which time former (c) was relettered as (e).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 81, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 enactment of subsection (c) and the 1998 amendment to subsection (e) “apply to offenses committed on or after June 11, 1998.”

Section 21(a), ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 amendment of (a) of this section applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.

Sec. 11.61.127.
Possession of child pornography.

A person commits the crime of possession of child pornography if the person knowingly possesses or knowingly accesses on a computer with intent to view any material that visually depicts conduct described in AS

11.41.455(a)

knowing that the production of the material involved the use of a child under 18 years of age who engaged in the conduct or a depiction of a part of an actual child under 18 years of age who, by manipulation, creation, or modification, appears to be engaged in the conduct.

This section does not apply to persons providing plethysmograph assessments in the course of a sex offender treatment program that meets the minimum standards under AS

33.30.011(a)(5)

.

Each film, audio, video, electronic, or electromagnetic recording, photograph, negative, slide, book, newspaper, magazine, or other material that visually or aurally depicts conduct described in AS

11.41.455(a)

that is possessed or accessed in violation of (a) of this section is a separate violation of this section.

In a prosecution under (a) of this section, it is an affirmative defense that the person

possessed or accessed fewer than three depictions described in (a) of this section; and

without allowing any person other than a law enforcement agency to view the depictions, either took reasonable steps to destroy the depictions, or reported the matter to a law enforcement agency and allowed the agency access to the depictions.

In a prosecution under (a) of this section, the prosecution is not required to prove the identity of a minor depicted or that the defendant knew the identity of a minor depicted.

In this section, “computer” has the meaning given in AS

11.46.990

.

Possession of child pornography is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1995; am §§ 7, 8, 9 ch 81 SLA 1998; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 18 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (d). In 2016, in subsection (b), " AS

33.30.011(a)(5)

" was substituted for " AS

33.30.011

(5)" to reflect the addition of
AS

33.30.011(b)

. In 2002, in subsection (b), “
AS

33.30.011

(5)” was substituted for “
AS

33.30.011(a)(5)

” to correct a manifest error in § 1,
ch. 70, SLA 1995. Subsections (d) and (e) were enacted as (e) and (g), respectively; relettered in 2010, at which time former subsection (d) was relettered as (g).

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125

(e) and (i) for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 21(a), ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 amendments of (a) and (c) of this section and the provisions of (d) — (f) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 18, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 222), relating to the amendment of this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1237 — 1239.

Sec. 11.61.128.
Distribution of indecent material to minors.

A person commits the crime of distribution of indecent material to minors if

the person, being 18 years of age or older, intentionally distributes or possesses with intent to distribute any material described in (2) and (3) of this subsection to either

a child that the person knows is under 16 years of age; or

another person that the person believes is a child under 16 years of age;

the person knows that the material depicts the following actual or simulated conduct:

sexual penetration;

the lewd touching of a person’s genitals, anus, or female breast;

masturbation;

bestiality;

the lewd exhibition of a person’s genitals, anus, or female breast; or

sexual masochism or sadism; and

the material is harmful to minors.

In this section, it is not a defense that the victim was not actually under 16 years of age.

In this section, “harmful to minors” means

the average individual, applying contemporary community standards, would find that the material, taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest in sex for persons under 16 years of age;

a reasonable person would find that the material, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, educational, political, or scientific value for persons under 16 years of age; and

the material depicts actual or simulated conduct in a way that is patently offensive to the prevailing standards in the adult community as a whole with respect to what is suitable for persons under 16 years of age.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, distribution of indecent material to minors is a class C felony.

Distribution of indecent material to minors is a class B felony if the defendant was, at the time of the offense, required to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63 or a similar law of another jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 24 SLA 2007; am §§ 9 — 12 ch 18 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 1 TSSLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (e); relettered in 2010. Subsections (d) and (e) were formerly (c) and (d), respectively; relettered in 2010, at which time an internal reference in subsection (d) was conformed.

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment for class B felonies, AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 97, SLA 2005, provides that this section applies “to offenses occurring on or after November 28, 2005.”

Section 36(b), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that the 2007 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to acts committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Section 21(a), ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 amendments of (a), (d), and (e) of this section and the provisions of (c) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.

Section 27(b), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendments to (a) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 18, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 222), relating to the amendment of this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1237 — 1239.

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 11.61.129.
Forfeiture of property used in indecent viewing or production of a picture or child pornography.

Property used to aid a violation of AS

11.61.123

—

11.61.128

or to aid the solicitation of, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit a violation of AS

11.61.123

—

11.61.128

may be forfeited to the state upon the conviction of the offender.

In this section, “property” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.468

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 41 SLA 2003; am § 7 ch 24 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent applicable to this section, see § 1, ch. 41, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 11.61.130.
Misconduct involving a corpse.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving a corpse if

except as authorized by law or in an emergency, the person intentionally disinters, removes, conceals, or mutilates a corpse;

the person engages in sexual penetration of a corpse; or

the person detains a corpse for a debt or demand or upon a lien or charge.

Misconduct involving a corpse is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “sexual penetration” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — AS 11.40.440; AS 11.40.450; AS 11.40.090.

TD: V, 89-90.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Collateral references. —

22A Am. Jur. 2d, Dead Bodies, §§ 74-78.

25A C.J.S., Dead Bodies, §§ 27 to 29.

Liability in damages for withholding corpse from relatives, 48 ALR3d 240.

Validity, construction, and application of statutes making it a criminal offense to mistreat or wrongfully dispose of dead body, 81 ALR3d 1071.

Immunity from liability for unlawful treatment of dead body in operation of hospital by state or governmental unit or agency, 18 ALR4th 858, 31 ALR Fed. 156.

Sec. 11.61.140.
Cruelty to animals.

A person commits cruelty to animals if the person

knowingly inflicts severe or prolonged physical pain or suffering on an animal;

has a legal duty to care for the animal and, with criminal negligence, fails to care for an animal and, as a result, causes the death of the animal or causes severe physical pain or prolonged suffering to the animal;

kills or injures an animal by the use of a decompression chamber;

intentionally kills or injures a pet or livestock by the use of poison;

knowingly kills or injures an animal, other than as provided in (1) or (3) of this subsection, with the intent to intimidate, threaten, or terrorize another person;

knowingly

engages in sexual conduct with an animal; or

under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.41.455

,

photographs or films, for purposes of sexual gratification, a person engaged in sexual conduct with an animal; or

causes, induces, aids, or encourages another person to engage in sexual conduct with an animal; or

intentionally permits sexual conduct with an animal to be conducted on any premises under the person’s control.

Each animal that is subject to cruelty to animals under (a) of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that the conduct of the defendant

was part of scientific research governed by accepted standards;

constituted the humane destruction of an animal;

conformed to accepted veterinary or animal husbandry practices;

was necessarily incidental to lawful fishing, hunting or trapping activities;

conformed to professionally accepted training and discipline standards.

In (a)(2) of this section, failure to provide the minimum standards of care for an animal under AS

03.55.100

is prima facie evidence of failure to care for an animal.

This section does not apply to generally accepted dog mushing or pulling contests or practices or rodeos or stock contests.

In this section, “sexual conduct” means any

touching or fondling by a person, either directly or through clothing, of the genitals or anus of an animal or any transfer or transmission of semen by the person on any part of the animal for the purpose of sexual gratification or arousal of the person;

contact, however slight, between the mouth, genitals, or anus of a person and the sex organ or anus of an animal, or any intrusion, however slight, of any part of the body of the person into the sex organ or anus of an animal, or any intrusion of the genitals or anus of the person into the mouth of the animal for the purpose of sexual gratification of the person.

Except as provided in (h) of this section, cruelty to animals under (a)(2), (5), (6), or (7) of this section is a class A misdemeanor. The court may also

require forfeiture of any animal affected to the state or to a custodian that supplies shelter, care, or medical treatment for the animal;

require the defendant to reimburse the state or a custodian for all reasonable costs incurred in providing necessary shelter, care, veterinary attention, or medical treatment for any animal affected;

prohibit or limit the defendant’s ownership, possession, or custody of animals for up to 10 years.

Cruelty to animals under (a)(1), (3), or (4) of this section is a class C felony. Cruelty to animals is also a class C felony if the person is convicted under (a)(2), (5), (6), or (7) of this section and the person has been previously convicted on one or more separate occasions within 10 years of the date of the present offense of a crime under this section, AS

11.61.145(a)(1)

or (2), or a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction having elements similar to those offenses. For a conviction under this subsection, the court may also

require forfeiture of any animal affected to the state or to a custodian that supplies shelter, care, or medical treatment for the animal;

require the defendant to reimburse the state or a custodian for all reasonable costs incurred in providing necessary shelter, care, veterinary attention, or medical treatment for any animal affected;

prohibit or limit the defendant’s ownership, possession, or custody of animals for up to 10 years.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1980; am § 20 ch 59 SLA 1982; am §§ 1, 2 ch 61 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 139 SLA 2004; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 96 SLA 2008; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 79 SLA 2010; am § 12 ch 60 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Ch. 139, SLA 2004, reenacted this section. In setting out the text of the section, the specific elements of the crime set out in (a) of the section were reordered and renumbered in order to maintain consistency of existing references within charging documents, court judgments, and the state criminal history computer system. Subsection (f) was enacted as (h); relettered in 2010, at which time subsections (f) and (g) were relettered as (g) and (h) and an internal reference in former subsection (f), relettered as (g), was conformed.

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provisions related to harming a police dog, see AS

11.56.705

—

11.56.710

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 17, 2017, in (a)(1), substituted “severe or prolonged” for “severe and prolonged”, in (a)(2), inserted “has a legal duty to care for the animal and,” at the beginning.

Editor's notes. —

Sec. 6, ch. 79, SLA 2010, provides that the changes to the penalties in (g) and (h) made by secs. 2 and 3, ch. 79, SLA 2010, “apply to offenses occurring on or after September 13, 2010.”

Sec. 11.61.145.
Promoting an exhibition of fighting animals.

A person commits the crime or offense, as applicable, of promoting an exhibition of fighting animals if the person

owns, possesses, keeps, or trains an animal with intent that it be engaged in an exhibition of fighting animals;

instigates, promotes, or has a pecuniary interest in an exhibition of fighting animals; or

attends an exhibition of fighting animals.

The animals, equipment, vehicles, money, and other personal property used by a person in a violation of (a)(1) or (2) of this section shall be forfeited to the state if the person is convicted of an offense under this section.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

Promoting an exhibition of fighting animals

under (a)(1) or (2) of this section is a class C felony;

under (a)(3) of this section is

a violation

for the first offense;

punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000 for the second offense; and

a class A misdemeanor for the third and each subsequent offense.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 8 ch 96 SLA 2008; am § 33 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “law,” “defense,” “possess” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — AS 11.40.480; AS 11.40.490; AS 11.40.500; AS 11.40.510; AS 11.40.520; AS 11.40.530.

TD: V, 90-91.

For punishment, for imprisonment for class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

.

For imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (d), see sec. 185(a)(24), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (d)(2), designated portions of (2) as (A) and (B), with portions of (A) further designated as (i) and (ii); in (d)(2)(a)(i), substituted “punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000” for “a Class B misdemeanor”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, repealed (c).

Collateral references. —

Validity, construction, and application of criminal statutes and ordinances to prosecution for dogfighting, 68 ALR6th 115.

Validity, construction, and application of criminal statutes and ordinances to prosecution for cockfighting, 69 ALR6th 207.

Sec. 11.61.150.
Obstruction of highways.

A person commits the offense of obstruction of highways if the person knowingly

places, drops, or permits to drop on a highway any substance that creates a substantial risk of physical injury to others using the highway; or

renders a highway impassable or passable only with unreasonable inconvenience or hazard.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (a)(1) of this section that

the defendant took reasonable steps to remove the substance from the highway; and

no person suffered physical injury as a result of the presence of the substance on the highway.

Obstruction of highways is a violation punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§
34, 35 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

Definition of “highway,” “physical injury,” “affirmative defense” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — AS 11.20.590.

TD: V, 90-93.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(a)(25), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a), substituted ‘‘offense’’ for ‘‘crime’’; in (c), substituted “violation punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000” for “class B misdemeanor”.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets and Bridges, §§ 254-258, 367, 368, 392-394.

40 C.J.S., Highways, §§ 248-272.